fi: Houkutusaineen tuoksuprofiili: Terho; Sinimailanen; Anis; Omena; Syksyinen metsä; Musta lakritsi; Uroksen virtsa; Setri; Kirsikka; Sitrushedelmä; Maissi; Kiimaisen naaraan virtsa; Maa/Muta; Melassi; Myski; Mänty/Metsä; Sokerijuurikas; Suden virtsa; Hajusteeton; Vanilja; Muu
sv: Attraktiv doftprofil: Ekollon; Alfalfa; Anis; Äpple; Höstskog; Svart lakrits; Bockurin; Ceder; Körsbär; Citrus; Majs; Hind i brunst; Jord/smuts; Melass; Mysk; Tall/skog; Sockerbeta; Vargurin; Doftfri; Vanilj; Annat
el: Προφίλ οσμής ουσίας προσέλκυσης: Βελανίδι; Μηδική; Γλυκάνισος; Μήλο; Φθινοπωρινό δάσος; Μαύρη γλυκόριζα; Ούρα αρσενικού ελαφιού; Κέδρος; Κεράσι; Εσπεριδοειδή; Καλαμπόκι; Οίστρος θηλυκού ελαφιού; Χώμα; Μελάσα; Μόσχος; Πεύκο/Δάσος; Ζαχαρότευτλο; Ούρα γκρίζου λύκου; Χωρίς άρωμα; Βανίλια; Άλλο
nb: Tiltrekkende duftprofil: Eikenøtt; Alfalfa; Anis; Eple; Høstskog; Svart lakris; Bukkeurin; Seder; Kirsebær; Sitrus; Mais; Brunsturin fra hunndyr; Jord; Melasse; Musk; Furu/skog; Sukkerbete; Ulveurin; Uparfymert; Vanilje; Annet
en: Attractant scent profile: Acorn; Alfalfa; Anise; Apple; Autumn woods; Black licorice; Buck urine; Cedar; Cherry; Citrus; Corn; Doe estrus; Earth/dirt; Molasses; Musky; Pine/woods; Sugar beet; Timberwolf urine; Unscented; Vanilla; Other
hr-HR: Profil mirisa privlačne tvari: Žir; Lucerna (alfalfa); Anis; Jabuka; Jesenja šuma; Crni sladić; Urin srndaća; Cedar; Trešnja; Citrusi; Kukuruz; Estrus srne; Zemlja/tlo; Melasa; Mošus; Bor/šuma; Šećerna repa; Urin vuka; Bez mirisa; Vanilija; Ostalo
nl: Lokgeurprofiel: Eikel; Alfalfa; Anijs; Appel; Herfstbos; Zwarte drop; Hertenbokurine; Ceder; Kers; Citrus; Maïs; Hinde-oestrus; Aarde/vuil; Melasse; Muskusachtig; Den/bos; Suikerbiet; Wolvenurine; Geurloos; Vanille; Overige
lt-LT: Atraktanto kvapo profilis: Gilių; Liucernos; Anyžių; Obuolių; Rudens miško; Juodojo saldymedžio; Patinų šlapimo; Kedrų; Vyšnių; Citrusių; Kukurūzų; Rujojančios patelės; Žemės / purvo; Melasos; Muskuso; Pušų / miško; Cukrinių runkelių; Pilkųjų vilkų šlapimo; Be kvapo; Vanilės; Kita
sk-SK: Profil atraktívnej vône: Žaluď; Lucerna; Aníz; Jablko; Jesenný les; Čierne sladké drievko; Srnčí/jelení moč; Céder; Čerešňa; Citrusy; Kukurica; Ruja samice; Zem/Hlina; Melasa; Pižmo; Borovica/les; Cukrová repa; Moč vlka dravého; Bez vône; Vanilka; Iné
cs: Profil vůně lákadla: Žalud; Vojtěška; Anýz; Jablko; Podzimní les; Černá lékořice; Moč srnce; Cedr; Třešeň; Citrus; Kukuřice; Říje laně/srny; Zemina/hlína; Melasa; Pižmo; Borovice/les; Cukrová řepa; Vlčí moč; Bez parfemace; Vanilka; Ostatní
da: Lokkemidlets duftprofil: Agern; Lucerne; Anis; Æble; Efterårsskov; Sort lakrids; Bukkeurin; Ceder; Kirsebær; Citrus; Majs; Rå i brunst; Jord/smuds; Melasse; Moskus; Fyr/skov; Sukkerroe; Ulveurin; Uden duft; Vanilje; Andet
fr: Profil olfactif de l’attractif: Gland; Luzerne; Anis; Pomme; Bois d’automne; Réglisse noire; Urine de chevreuil; Cèdre; Cerise; Agrumes; Maïs; Œstrus de biche; Terre/sol; Mélasse; Musqué; Pin/bois; Betterave sucrière; Urine de loup gris; Sans parfum; Vanille; Autre
pl: Profil zapachowy wabika: Żołądź; Lucerna; Anyż; Jabłko; Jesienny las; Czarna lukrecja; Mocz kozła; Cedr; Wiśnia; Cytrus; Kukurydza; Ruja łani; Ziemia/gleba; Melasa; Piżmo; Sosna/las; Burak cukrowy; Mocz wilka; Bezzapachowy; Wanilia; Inny
ko: 유인제 향 프로필: 도토리; 알팔파; 아니스; 사과; 가을 숲; 감초; 수사슴 소변; 삼나무; 체리; 시트러스; 옥수수; 발정기 암사슴; 흙/먼지; 당밀; 머스크; 소나무/숲; 사탕무; 팀버울프 소변; 무향; 바닐라; 기타
zh-CN: 引诱剂气味特征: 橡果; 紫花苜蓿; 茴香; 苹果; 秋木; 黑甘草; 雄鹿尿液; 雪松; 樱桃; 柑橘; 玉米; 发情母鹿; 泥土; 糖蜜; 麝香; 松树/木材; 甜菜; 灰狼尿液; 无香; 香草; 其他
sl-SI: Profil privabljala: Želod; Lucerna; Janež; Jabolko; Jesenski gozd; Črni sladki koren; Urin srnjaka/jelena; Cedra; Češnja; Citrusi; Koruza; Vonj samice v gonitvi; Zemlja/prst; Melasa; Mošus; Bor/gozd; Sladkorna pesa; Urin sivega volka; Brez vonja; Vanilja; Drugo
de: Duftprofil des Lockstoffs: Eichel; Luzerne; Anis; Apfel; Herbstwald; Schwarze Lakritze; Bockurin; Zeder; Kirsche; Zitrus; Mais; Brunfturin (Ricke); Erde/Boden; Melasse; Moschus; Kiefer/Wald; Zuckerrübe; Timberwolf-Urin; Geruchsneutral; Vanille; Sonstige
es: Perfil de aroma atrayente: Bellota; Alfalfa; Anís; Manzana; Bosque de otoño; Regaliz negro; Orina de ciervo; Cedro; Cereza; Cítrico; Maíz; Cierva en celo; Tierra/barro; Melaza; Almizclado; Pino/bosque; Remolacha azucarera; Orina de lobo gris; Sin olor; Vainilla; Otro
hu: Csalogató illat profilja: Makk; Lucerna; Ánizs; Alma; Őszi erdő; Fekete édesgyökér; Bakvizelet; Cédrus; Cseresznye; Citrus; Kukorica; Üzekedő suta; Föld/talaj; Melasz; Pézsma; Fenyő/erdő; Cukorrépa; Farkasvizelet; Illatmentes; Vanília; Egyéb
vi: Mùi hương thu hút: Quả sồi; Cỏ linh lăng; Hoa hồi; Táo; Hương rừng mùa thu; Cam thảo đen; Nước tiểu hươu đực; Tuyết tùng; Anh đào; Cam chanh; Ngô; Hươu cái động dục; Đất/Bụi; Mật đường; Xạ hương; Thông/rừng; Củ cải đường; Nước tiểu sói rừng; Không mùi; Vani; Khác
ro-RO: Profil de parfum atractiv: Ghindă; Lucernă; Anason; Măr; Pădure de toamnă; Lemn dulce; Urină de mascul; Cedru; Cireașă; Citrice; Porumb; Femelă în estru; Pământ/sol; Melasă; Mosc; Pin/pădure; Sfeclă de zahăr; Urină de lup; Fără miros; Vanilie; Altele
ru: Профиль запаха приманки: Желудь; Люцерна; Анис; Яблоко; Осенний лес; Черная лакрица; Моча самца; Кедр; Вишня; Цитрус; Кукуруза; Самка в период течки; Земля/грязь; Патока; Мускус; Хвоя/лес; Сахарная свекла; Моча лесного волка; Без запаха; Ваниль; Другое
ja: 誘引物質の香りプロファイル: どんぐり; アルファルファ; アニス; りんご; オータムウッズ; ブラックリコリス; 雄鹿の尿; シダー; チェリー; シトラス; コーン; 発情期の雌鹿の尿; 土・泥; 糖蜜; ムスキー; 松・森; テンサイ; シンリンオオカミの尿; 無香料; バニラ; その他
pt-BR: Perfil de aroma atrativo: Bolota; Alfafa; Anis; Maçã; Bosque de outono; Alcaçuz preto; Urina de cervo macho; Cedro; Cereja; Cítrico; Milho; Cervo fêmea no cio; Terra; Melaço; Almiscarado; Pinho/bosque; Beterraba sacarina; Urina de lobo-cinzento; Sem cheiro; Baunilha; Outro
zh-TW: 誘捕劑氣味特徵: 橡實; 苜蓿; 八角; 蘋果; 秋季森林; 黑甘草; 雄鹿尿液; 雪松; 櫻桃; 柑橘; 玉米; 雌鹿發情期; 泥土; 糖蜜; 麝香; 松樹/木質; 甜菜根; 森林狼尿液; 無香味; 香草; 其他
it: Profilo olfattivo attraente: Ghianda; Erba medica; Anice; Mela; Bosco autunnale; Liquirizia; Urina di maschio; Cedro; Ciliegia; Agrumi; Mais; Femmina in estro; Terra/Terriccio; Melassa; Muschiato; Pino/Bosco; Barbabietola da zucchero; Urina di lupo; Inodore; Vaniglia; Altro
tr: Çekici koku profili: Meşe palamudu; Yonca; Anason; Elma; Sonbahar ormanı; Siyah meyan kökü; Erkek geyik idrarı; Sedir; Kiraz; Narenciye; Mısır; Kızgınlık dönemi dişi geyik; Toprak; Melas; Misk; Çam/orman; Şeker pancarı; Orman kurdu idrarı; Kokusuz; Vanilya; Diğer
pt-PT: Perfil de aroma atrativo: Bolota; Alfafa; Anis; Maçã; Bosque de outono; Alcaçuz preto; Urina de veado (macho); Cedro; Cereja; Citrinos; Milho; Urina de veado (fêmea em cio); Terra/solo; Melaço; Almiscarado; Pinho/bosque; Beterraba; Urina de lobo; Sem perfume; Baunilha; Outros
bg-BG: Ароматен профил на примамката: Жълъд; Люцерна; Анасон; Ябълка; Есенна гора; Лакриц; Урина от елен; Кедър; Череша; Цитрус; Царевица; Урина от кошута в разгонване; Пръст/почва; Меласа; Мускус; Бор/гора; Захарно цвекло; Урина от вълк; Без аромат; Ванилия; Друго
th: ลักษณะกลิ่นดึงดูดใจ: ลูกโอ๊ก; อัลฟัลฟ่า; โป๊ยกั๊ก; แอปเปิล; ป่าฤดูใบไม้ร่วง; ชะเอมเทศดำ; ปัสสาวะกวางตัวผู้; ซีดาร์; เชอร์รี่; ซิตรัส; ข้าวโพด; กวางตัวเมียเป็นสัด; ดิน/โคลน; กากน้ำตาล; มัสก์; สน/ป่าไม้; ชูการ์บีต; ปัสสาวะหมาป่าทิมเบอร์วูล์ฟ; ไม่มีกลิ่น; วานิลลา; อื่นๆ